Georgia, session 2025_26, HB363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 16-7-21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to criminal
trespass, is amended by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(f) A person commits the offense of criminal trespass when he or she knowingly and
without authority enters and remains upon the land or premises of another person and
willfully and maliciously interrupts or disturbs any assembly of people met or convened
for purposes of religious worship or observance or for purposes of acknowledging the death
of an individual in such a manner that a reasonable person would conclude that the person
who commits the act is a threat to the safety of any person so assembled."
H. B. 363
- 1 -

LC 48 1409
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 363
- 2 -